tests/ky-verbsimp.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../tr-ky.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ky-tr.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] Imperatives":
    бол<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : бол
    бол<v><iv><imp><p2><frm><sg> : болуңуз
    бол<v><iv><imp><p2><frm><sg> : болуң
    бол<v><iv><imp><p2><frm><pl> : болуңуздар
    сүй<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : сүй
    сүй<v><tv><imp><p2><frm><sg> : сүйүңүз
    сүй<v><tv><imp><p2><frm><sg> : сүйүң
    сүй<v><tv><imp><p2><frm><pl> : сүйүңүздөр
    иште<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : иште
    иште<v><iv><imp><p2><frm><sg> : иштеңиз
    иште<v><iv><imp><p2><frm><sg> : иштең
    иште<v><iv><imp><p2><frm><pl> : иштеңиздер
    тап<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : тап
    тап<v><tv><imp><p2><frm><sg> : табыңыз
    тап<v><tv><imp><p2><frm><sg> : табың
    тап<v><tv><imp><p2><frm><pl> : табыңыздар

  "[lexc] Negative imperatives":
    бол<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : болбо
    бол<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><frm><sg> : болбоңуз
    бол<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><frm><sg> : болбоң
    бол<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><frm><pl> : болбоңуздар
    сүй<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : сүйбө
    сүй<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><frm><sg> : сүйбөңүз
    сүй<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><frm><sg> : сүйбөң
    сүй<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><frm><pl> : сүйбөңүздөр
    иште<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : иштебе
    иште<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><frm><sg> : иштебеңиз
    иште<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><frm><sg> : иштебең
    иште<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><frm><pl> : иштебеңиздер
    тап<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : таппа
    тап<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><frm><sg> : таппаңыз
    тап<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><frm><sg> : таппаң
    тап<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><frm><pl> : таппаңыздар
